North Dakota, session 69, HB1099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-06-07.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
16.1-06-07.1. Arrangement of names on ballot - Presidential electors.
1. In presidential election years the ballot provided for in section 16.1-06-05 must include the
designation of the office of president and vice president as the first listing of the continuous
listing of the designation of each office to be voted for. The names of presidential electors,
presented in one certificate of nomination, must be arranged in a group enclosed in brackets
under the designation of the office of president and vice president on the right side of the
ballot column.
2. To the left and opposite the center of each group of electors' names must be printed in bold
type the surnamename of the presidential candidate represented and in line with such
surnamethe candidate's name must be placed a single oval. A mark within suchan oval by the
voter must be designated as a vote for all the electors. The appropriate party designation must
appear, in smaller type, under the surnamename of the presidential candidate represented.

H. B. NO. 1099 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1099.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State